Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-314
Zoning regulations; appeal; hearing.

Any person aggrieved, or taxpayer affected, by any decision of an administrative agency made in its administration of airport zoning regulations adopted under sections 3-301 to 3-333, or any governing body of a political subdivision, or any joint airport zoning board, which is of the opinion that a decision of such an administrative agency is an improper application of airport zoning regulations of concern to such governing body or board, may appeal to the board of adjustment authorized to hear and decide appeals from the decisions of such administrative agency.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 8(1), p. 686.